Florida, session 2026, HB911.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (21) is added to section 553.73,
Florida Statutes, to read:
553.73 Florida Building Code.—
(21)(a) Beginning with the adoption of the 9th edition of
the Florida Building Code, the commission shall require that the
entire building envelope of all new construction, including
exterior walls and doors, roofs, skylights, glazing, and glass
blocks, of the following buildings or structures meet the impact
resistant requirements of the Florida Building Code and be
constructed with wind-resistant materials designed and built to
withstand wind speeds of at least 160 miles per hour:
1. R1 and R2 multistory residential occupancies containing
dwelling units or sleeping units.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb911-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 911 2026
2. New residential construction located within 5 miles of
the mean high-water line of any tidal water of this state.
3. New residential construction located in a high-velocity
hurricane zone under the Florida Building Code.
4. Buildings or structures designated or used as an
emergency shelter during a natural emergency.
5. The rebuilding of buildings or structures that meet the
criteria in subparagraphs 1.-4. which are uninhabitable or
destroyed by a natural emergency.
(b) As used in this subsection, the term "natural
emergency" has the same meaning as in s. 252.34.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb911-00